{"post-75640": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1511559645000", "message": "A few hours travel from the nearest town deep into the woods and those searching may come upon tall, wrought iron gates emblazoned with the silhouette of a sparse tree, the naked branches creeping from the central trunk into the imagery of either door of the gate. On a tarnished, brass plaque set in the stone pillars that flanked either gate, a name was etched in gorgeous calligraphy: \"Highwind Manor\" Yet even from here, one could not see the manor proper, instead a road\u00a0 of flagstones led off into the recesses of pallid trees that seemed to mock the gate's own emblem. A chain complete with padlock seemed as if it might secure the gate from within, yet the way it hung slack off of one of the doors made it clear that it wasn't going to be doing much in the way of security if anyone decided to simply march in, and though a the post that may once have held a summons bell did exist, it lacked anything to wring the only semblance of its original purpose laying on the ground rusted beyond use. It seemed Lord\u00a0Francoeur didn't have many visitors.\u00a0If one ventured through the gates without a summons, no magic would impede them. No traps or wild dogs. The wide cobblestone path, large enough for a wagon to travel down, might feel different beneath their feet, hooves, tentacles, or any other locomotive appendages they may have, but it offered little else of the sensation of nobility. No manicured grass or servants coming to greet them, and from the sounds of it, wild animals didn't deeply concern themselves with the barrier the fence provided. Eventually, however, if one followed the oath to its natural completion, above them would loom a mammoth, four storied building that stretched out in every direction, as if trying desperately to claim any ground it could as its own. From the peeling paints and vines that crept up the walls, one might think it abandoned if not for a few windows, still alight in the night. Here it was, Manor Highwind. If one were to be seeking the quest posted about Fort Lortham, perhaps the front door, as intimidating as the dark wooden beast may be would be the best choice.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<br>A few hours travel from the nearest town deep into the woods and those searching may come upon tall, wrought iron gates emblazoned with the silhouette of a sparse tree, the naked branches creeping from the central trunk into the imagery of either door of the gate. On a tarnished, brass plaque set in the stone pillars that flanked either gate, a name was etched in gorgeous calligraphy: \"Highwind Manor\" Yet even from here, one could not see the manor proper, instead a road\u00a0 of flagstones led off into the recesses of pallid trees that seemed to mock the gate's own emblem. A chain complete with padlock seemed as if it might secure the gate from within, yet the way it hung slack off of one of the doors made it clear that it wasn't going to be doing much in the way of security if anyone decided to simply march in, and though a the post that may once have held a summons bell did exist, it lacked anything to wring the only semblance of its original purpose laying on the ground rusted beyond use. It seemed Lord\u00a0Francoeur didn't have many visitors.\u00a0<br/><br/>If one ventured through the gates without a summons, no magic would impede them. No traps or wild dogs. The wide cobblestone path, large enough for a wagon to travel down, might feel different beneath their feet, hooves, tentacles, or any other locomotive appendages they may have, but it offered little else of the sensation of nobility. No manicured grass or servants coming to greet them, and from the sounds of it, wild animals didn't deeply concern themselves with the barrier the fence provided. Eventually, however, if one followed the oath to its natural completion, above them would loom a mammoth, four storied building that stretched out in every direction, as if trying desperately to claim any ground it could as its own. From the peeling paints and vines that crept up the walls, one might think it abandoned if not for a few windows, still alight in the night. Here it was, Manor Highwind. If one were to be seeking the quest posted about Fort Lortham, perhaps the front door, as intimidating as the dark wooden beast may be would be the best choice.\u00a0</br>"}, "post-75892": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1512057321000", "message": "Through the muddy roads i hastily made my way, The rain pouring from the cold skies in quantities rarely seen in these parts and if that wasn't enough the rain slowly turned to ice as the night set upon me, My pace increasing while searching for any natural protection from the balls of ice,that seemed to tear themselves through the leaves of the surroundings trees. it was at this moment that i found it, An iron gate marked by two stone pillars appeared at the side of the road after a dark patch of vegetation. there wasn't time to hesitate, I had to get out of this storm, I opened the creaking gate as i made my way to the mansion with the road feeling even stranger than the sulking wet mud around my feet, Noticing that the windows had a flickering light in them, Giving me a slight hope of a warm place to rest. I reached a small overhang at the side of the mansion. Only noticing how far i ran until i looked back from the front porch. I took some time to breath as i started to shake. I didn't take in my surroundings as i started to knock on the door. \"anyone in there\" i shouted as i dropped my bag next to me.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Through the muddy roads i hastily made my way, The rain pouring from the cold skies in quantities rarely seen in these parts and if that wasn't enough the rain slowly turned to ice as the night set upon me, My pace increasing while searching for any natural protection from the balls of ice,that seemed to tear themselves through the leaves of the surroundings trees. it was at this moment that i found it, An iron gate marked by two stone pillars appeared at the side of the road after a dark patch of vegetation. there wasn't time to hesitate, I had to get out of this storm, I opened the creaking gate as i made my way to the mansion with the road feeling even stranger than the sulking wet mud around my feet, Noticing that the windows had a flickering light in them, Giving me a slight hope of a warm place to rest. I reached a small overhang at the side of the mansion. Only noticing how far i ran until i looked back from the front porch. I took some time to breath as i started to shake. I didn't take in my surroundings as i started to knock on the door. \"anyone in there\" i shouted as i dropped my bag next to me."}, "post-75913": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1512088065000", "message": "For a few solitary minutes, it seemed the only one willing to heed her call was the smiling gargoyle whose hands grasped the large brass knocker. With a rumble, and then a creak of protest, however, the door swung open. For a moment it seemed too dark to see, until a figure moved a candle between them, the light flickering as the winds outside teased the small flame, threatening to extinguish it. The man on beyond the light, however, was more of a concern. He was short and wiry, a few inches shorter than the girl before him, though the lines on his weathered face hinted at his middle age. A messy mass of thick brown hair matted with his beard. His clothing was simple and stained, hardly the befitting one whom would answer an estate's doors, but his dark, glittering eyes sized the girl up. \"You must be here for the job.\" he reasoned, his voice strained and high-pitched, as though forcing himself to speak after a century of silence. \"Come in. I'm Vex, welcome to Manor Highwind blah blah\" he chattered, waving off the ceremony of introduction as he stepped aside, allowing her to enter if she chose to do so.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "For a few solitary minutes, it seemed the only one willing to heed her call was the smiling gargoyle whose hands grasped the large brass knocker. With a rumble, and then a creak of protest, however, the door swung open. For a moment it seemed too dark to see, until a figure moved a candle between them, the light flickering as the winds outside teased the small flame, threatening to extinguish it. The man on beyond the light, however, was more of a concern. He was short and wiry, a few inches shorter than the girl before him, though the lines on his weathered face hinted at his middle age. A messy mass of thick brown hair matted with his beard. His clothing was simple and stained, hardly the befitting one whom would answer an estate's doors, but his dark, glittering eyes sized the girl up. "}, "post-75955": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1512153832000", "message": "Before i could enter he already left the door open for me, i wasn't in a position to argue with the night approaching i thought as i grabbed my bag and carefully entered the doors grand mansion carefully choosing my words as i did so \"thank you for answering me, a storm like that i haven't seen in quite some time\". the storm that seemed so loud only seconds ago was now no more than a constant ticketing on the mansion. my clothes however were still dripping from the rain. \"I'm really sorry for my state\" i said as i looked at him for the first time i entered. I wasn't quite sure what to make of him, he seemed open to visitors yet i couldn't quite place him his dark eyes that i was only able to see with a flicker was quite ominous. Possibly The cold dark skies where my reason for this distrust.\u00a0I held my bag behind me as i started to explain that i dint know of what quest he spoke yet that maybe be able to help.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Before i could enter he already left the door open for me, i wasn't in a position to argue with the night approaching i thought as i grabbed my bag and carefully entered the doors grand mansion carefully choosing my words as i did so \"thank you for answering me, a storm like that i haven't seen in quite some time\". the storm that seemed so loud only seconds ago was now no more than a constant ticketing on the mansion. my clothes however were still dripping from the rain. \"I'm really sorry for my state\" i said as i looked at him for the first time i entered. I wasn't quite sure what to make of him, he seemed open to visitors yet i couldn't quite place him his dark eyes that i was only able to see with a flicker was quite ominous. Possibly The cold dark skies where my reason for this distrust.\u00a0"}, "post-75959": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1512157362000", "message": "When told she didn't know of the quest, Vex hesitated, turning to look more fully at the girl before him. She was young, but she looked fairly strong. She only had a dagger, which could be an issue, but he was certain that given some prodding Lord Baxter would be willing to supply her. \"Well, if you aren't here for the mission then I guess you need to speak with Lord Baxter, he's the one who owns this place. I'm just his ranger.\" he explained with a wave of his hand. \"Let me get you something to dry off with, just don't put anything in your pockets, alright stranger?\" wandering off and leaving Tsali alone in the entryway. Within, the manor seemed even darker than the night, and a far off rumble of thunder seemed to accent the already uneasy atmosphere. Thankfully the ranger had left the candle on a small wooden table, providing some light for their visitor as he wandered casually off into the pitch blackness. Barely discernible in the darkness a staircase with large, flourishing railings led up to the second floor, a door at the top framed with some light beyond. Around her, art, strange wooden decor and the occasional head of a taxidermied beast gave the impression of a lived-in estate, if not for the cobwebs that hung off of them in curtains, caked in so much dust it seemed even the spiders had abandoned them. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When told she didn't know of the quest, Vex hesitated, turning to look more fully at the girl before him. She was young, but she looked fairly strong. She only had a dagger, which could be an issue, but he was certain that given some prodding Lord Baxter would be willing to supply her. \"Well, if you aren't here for the mission then I guess you need to speak with Lord Baxter, he's the one who owns this place. I'm just his ranger.\" he explained with a wave of his hand. \"Let me get you something to dry off with, just don't put anything in your pockets, alright stranger?\" wandering off and leaving Tsali alone in the entryway. Within, the manor seemed even darker than the night, and a far off rumble of thunder seemed to accent the already uneasy atmosphere. Thankfully the ranger had left the candle on a small wooden table, providing some light for their visitor as he wandered casually off into the pitch blackness. "}, "post-75967": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1512164741000", "message": "\"Ofcourse not\" i said \"And thank you\" i smiled as you walked off, Lowering my drenched hood and trying not to leave too many puddles around the place as i started wondering who Lord baxter could be. the dusty hall giving little clues to me besides the was interested in art and paintings.\u00a0 My suspicion of the other man dropped however, The man seemed quite nice even if i couldn't quite place him. the candle flickered every now and then forming a small warm light was it not for the door at the top of the stairs. So that's where the light came from i thought thinking back to when i saw a fairly well lit mansion it the windows. I remained in my place as i rubbed my arms together, breathing in them to warm myself up. hoping the ranger would return soon with something warmer.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Ofcourse not\" i said \"And thank you\" i smiled as you walked off, Lowering my drenched hood and trying not to leave too many puddles around the place as i started wondering who Lord baxter could be. the dusty hall giving little clues to me besides the was interested in art and paintings.\u00a0 My suspicion of the other man dropped however, The man seemed quite nice even if i couldn't quite place him. the candle flickered every now and then forming a small warm light was it not for the door at the top of the stairs. So that's where the light came from i thought thinking back to when i saw a fairly well lit mansion it the windows. I remained in my place as i rubbed my arms together, breathing in them to warm myself up. hoping the ranger would return soon with something warmer."}, "post-76071": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1512355033000", "message": "After a few minutes in the darkness, the storm outside seeming to increase in volume as if battling the oppressive silence that would otherwise dominate the estate, a flicker of the candle's light cast a rippling shadow that seemed to summon the ranger from his errand. Standing before her unexpectedly, he held out a thick towel, knitted together with plush fabrics. Beneath it was a new set of clothes, an off-white loose-fitting shirt clearly cut for a man, though the open front was thankfully set with small leather thongs one could tie together for modesty if one chose to do so and a pair of breeches. \"We don't have any spare clothes for women.\" he explained to her, though he lacked much of an apologetic tone on the subject. With a nod of his head he directed her to follow him as he led the way a short distance to a door set adjacent to the once-grand staircase. Swinging it open he held the candle inside for her benefit, revealing...monsters! All around them, beasts of various shapes and sizes loomed, faces locked in snarls, lithe bodies poised to pounce upon them! With a sweep of the candle, however, as Vex headed further into the room their wooden expressions and the cobwebs that hung from them revealed their true nature of taxidermy. A number of magical and non-magical beasts cast fearsome shadows as the candles flickered, and the ranger set the candle on the head of a long since expired wolf. \"You can get changed in here.\" he directed. \"Just leave your old clothes and I'll see to it that they're dried by the time you leave.\" he explained, heading to the door. \"There's a lock on the inside, and nothing to fit in your pockets, so take your time. When you're ready I'll take you to see Lord Baxter.\" he told her, closing the door behind him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "After a few minutes in the darkness, the storm outside seeming to increase in volume as if battling the oppressive silence that would otherwise dominate the estate, a flicker of the candle's light cast a rippling shadow that seemed to summon the ranger from his errand. Standing before her unexpectedly, he held out a thick towel, knitted together with plush fabrics. Beneath it was a new set of clothes, an off-white loose-fitting shirt clearly cut for a man, though the open front was thankfully set with small leather thongs one could tie together for modesty if one chose to do so and a pair of breeches. "}, "post-76099": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1512420732000", "message": "her concentration was abruptly broken as the man came quietly around the corner again, His footsteps drowned out by the cold icy rain fall. her gaze focused away from the dusty paintings and back at the man again. I gladly took the dry clothes and knitted blanket in her hands, thanking the man with a small bow for the hospitality, \"I'm already more than happy with what you could give me here, thank you\". Relieved that i could soon start to warm myself up again from the cold wet rain that was still soaked into the thick fabric of my robes.I followed the man again with all my possessions as he made his way further down the hall, before noticing a muffling smell of wild beasts, like the smell of a herd of unwashed dogs in an inclosed area which was not far from the reality. The shadows seen from the candle light revealed them even before the door was fully opened. i jumped back defensively as it seemed for a moment that the creatures were alive thanks to the flickering candle light along the outlines of the beasts. however a quick sweep revealed the taxidermy that was the beasts. I let my guard down again, pulling my hand away from my dagger pouch. i followed behind him again taking in the trophy's around the room of various beasts, some rare and some common. Some she hadn't seen sinds her journey from the great plains, My nostalgic wave quickly stopped as the man pointed me towards a room. \"Thank you\" i said before realizing i hadn't introduced myself yet in my haste to get somewhere dry. \"Im tsali\" i said as i turned back towards the man, \"sorry i hadn't introduced myself before in the haste\" i turned back again towards the door as i opened it and locking it behind me again, Coming to a small side room with little more than a chair as i begun to dry myself off with the towel, Changing into the new set of clothes that could do well for now. beginning some small talk over the door \"May i ask you story?\" i asked as was changing, Trying to make the best of the situation.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "her concentration was abruptly broken as the man came quietly around the corner again, His footsteps drowned out by the cold icy rain fall. her gaze focused away from the dusty paintings and back at the man again. I gladly took the dry clothes and knitted blanket in her hands, thanking the man with a small bow for the hospitality, \"I'm already more than happy with what you could give me here, thank you\". Relieved that i could soon start to warm myself up again from the cold wet rain that was still soaked into the thick fabric of my robes."}, "post-76108": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1512428128000", "message": "Whether or not one might feel uncomfortable with the strange ranger around, he seemed to prove trustworthy in this way. Facing the far wall, his back to the door, he listened to the girl introduce herself, as well as ask questions about him. \"I'm nobody important.\" he was quick to say, clearly avoiding the topic of conversation she attempted to bring up. \"I simply serve Lord Baxter in his searches, as well as hunting or capturing certain creatures for his studies.\" Whether or not he was interested in returning her curiosity was rather doubtful, considering the silence he let fill the space between them as he waited for her to finish changing. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Whether or not one might feel uncomfortable with the strange ranger around, he seemed to prove trustworthy in this way. Facing the far wall, his back to the door, he listened to the girl introduce herself, as well as ask questions about him. \"I'm nobody important.\" he was quick to say, clearly avoiding the topic of conversation she attempted to bring up. \"I simply serve Lord Baxter in his searches, as well as hunting or capturing certain creatures for his studies.\" Whether or not he was interested in returning her curiosity was rather doubtful, considering the silence he let fill the space between them as he waited for her to finish changing. "}, "post-76141": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1512503879000", "message": "I paused for a moment after the man replied hastily, thinking of the appropriate words for this situation. \"Sounds like you're pretty important to bexter\" I said with slight smile on my lips after a few moments passed, i continued by making a small necklace for my flask out of the piece of rope which it was attached to my pants with and leaving my dagger in my bag. I didn't push for any further conversation and after a few more minutes of silence. The sound of the locking mechanism filled the room for a brief moment before i stepped out of the room back into muffling smell of the other room, Facing towards you \"I'm back\" i said in my new attire, my possessions in the other room, As spread out as i could lay them for them to dry.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "I paused for a moment after the man replied hastily, thinking of the appropriate words for this situation. \"Sounds like you're pretty important to bexter\" I said with slight smile on my lips after a few moments passed, i continued by making a small necklace for my flask out of the piece of rope which it was attached to my pants with and leaving my dagger in my bag. I didn't push for any further conversation and after a few more minutes of silence. The sound of the locking mechanism filled the room for a brief moment before i stepped out of the room back into muffling smell of the other room, Facing towards you \"I'm back\" i said in my new attire, my possessions in the other room, As spread out as i could lay them for them to dry."}, "post-76191": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1512592001000", "message": "The silence was short-lived, thanks to Tsali's quick dressing, and once she'd left the room, Vex gave a nod. \"I will get your things dried and returned to you by the time you leave.\" he assured her. Retrieving the candle, he headed towards the ornate staircase. \"Lord Baxter will see you now. Make sure you refer to him as \"Lord Francoeur\" or \"milord\". Stand straight, and try not to waste his time. If all goes well, you should at the very least find shelter until the storm has ended.\" he instructed. When at last they'd reached the top of the stairs, faced now with a tall, shadowed door, a small amount of light flickering beneath it. Pushing the handle down, Vex entered the room without so much as a knock.\"Lord Baxter.\" he addressed to a young man in his mid-twenties who sat with his back to the new visitors. With a sigh of annoyance, the young man turned towards his ranger with such force his ponytail of hair flicked over his shoulder. When he saw the woman, however, he slammed the book on his desk shut, setting aside his quill and getting to his feet with alacrity. \"Ah, at last someone has responded to my summons!\" he declared, striding towards Tsali Kaue. \"You must have many questions for me, I'm sure. After all, I am the utmost authority on the subject. I'll admit, I hardly expected it to be a woman to respond, but I suppose I can't exactly be pi- are those my clothes?\" he rambled., only stopping when he looked her up and down enough to see that she most certainly was wearing clothing quite like his own. It was hardly surprising Vex would choose them, however, as the man stood before her was thin, and about her height. Though it was difficult to see between two candles, his blue eyes searched her face and then Vex's, clearly expecting an explanation. ", "link_list": ["/user/2670"], "image_list": [], "html": "The silence was short-lived, thanks to Tsali's quick dressing, and once she'd left the room, Vex gave a nod. \"I will get your things dried and returned to you by the time you leave.\" he assured her. Retrieving the candle, he headed towards the ornate staircase. \"Lord Baxter will see you now. Make sure you refer to him as \"Lord Francoeur\" or \"milord\". Stand straight, and try not to waste his time. If all goes well, you should at the very least find shelter until the storm has ended.\" he instructed. When at last they'd reached the top of the stairs, faced now with a tall, shadowed door, a small amount of light flickering beneath it. Pushing the handle down, Vex entered the room without so much as a knock."}, "post-76305": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1512769856000", "message": "\"Thank you\" i replied to his calming words. I felt safe, Surprisingly so. probably because of the hospitality with which the man took me in although the tension started to rise again as the man took me upstairs to meet the man who presumably owned this estate. The realization that i was still in unfamiliar territory came over me. I quickly came back to the situation at hand however as the man started to quickly explain to me some rules for when i talked to this man. and before i knew it the door was open in front of me. Hoping i would make a good impression or at least receive a place to sleep.\u00a0I cautiously followed the man into the room where i saw a lonesome man, The man called Milord or baxter it was Lord Francoeur for me however as it seemed like the best of the options. I straightened my back as i thought of my best way to go about this, 'Ask about the quest first?' the sound of the shutting book filling the air as he faced towards me. 'Maybe i could explain my situation first or maybe it was better to offer my help from the start'. i held my posture with firm as i looked back at his exciting tone abruptly stopped as he noticed as i was wearing his clothing. \"I..\" I mumbled as i choked on my words for a moment. \"I'm terribly sorry to face you like this Lord Francoeur\" i begun as i had found my words again\u00a0\u00a0\"yet i came here to shelter from the rain and i would wish to trade my services for this quest in trade for shelter\" i said as professional as i could as i let the air speak for a moment. A tense feeling washed over me. \"And i would like to thank you, Your ranger has done an excellent job receiving me here\".", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Thank you\" i replied to his calming words. I felt safe, Surprisingly so. probably because of the hospitality with which the man took me in although the tension started to rise again as the man took me upstairs to meet the man who presumably owned this estate. The realization that i was still in unfamiliar territory came over me. I quickly came back to the situation at hand however as the man started to quickly explain to me some rules for when i talked to this man. and before i knew it the door was open in front of me. Hoping i would make a good impression or at least receive a place to sleep.\u00a0"}, "post-76310": {"user": "Hilde", "user_num": 2697, "timestamp": "1512776443000", "message": "There was a woman, coming up the forest path. She was tall, but that was most certainly not her most visible feature. There was a bow fit for a titan secured on her back, the string running across her chest, cast in shining metal. Massive arrows poked out, head-first, from behind her shoulder, their fletching sticking out in reach of her right hand. A rough cloak spared her from some of the hailstorm, but she was soaked through nonetheless. Even still, she walked stoically, as though careless of the weather.Hilde disliked rain, as it forced her to dry off her cuirass, lest it begin to rust. She disliked hail, too. Her arms were mostly immune to its effects, but her head was lacking in protection. Once, a chunk of ice had got into her eye, and it stung for weeks. Now, she was hunched over as she walked, left arm raised protectively, making sure the hail not cause her any major problems. She was used to such weather, but that did not mean she liked it. Hilde spit a chunk of ice on the ground, grumbling under her breath. She'd opened her mouth for but a moment!She was in sight of the manor, but it would be a few minutes more before she reached it. A few more minutes of slogging through mud and God's own slingshot barrage. A particularly large piece struck her ear, making her wince. Eventually, however, she managed to make her way up to the manor's gates. Open and unlocked. And old. The mercenary grimaced, but pushed forward regardless. She paid little attention to the gardens, but what she saw did not fill her with confidence. She wasn't expensive, but could this fellow afford even her? This 'toff didn't seem particularly loaded. Well, she'd have to see. The mercenary archer reached the front doors of the run-down manor -these, at least, looked solid- and gave a sonorous knock, with her prodigious right arm. Just a lovetap, of course, but the booming sound it produced had to have been heard. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There was a woman, coming up the forest path. She was tall, but that was most certainly not her most visible feature. There was a bow fit for a titan secured on her back, the string running across her chest, cast in shining metal. Massive arrows poked out, head-first, from behind her shoulder, their fletching sticking out in reach of her right hand. A rough cloak spared her from some of the hailstorm, but she was soaked through nonetheless. Even still, she walked stoically, as though careless of the weather."}, "post-76335": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1512802785000", "message": "When Tsali offered to take the quest, even going so far as to compliment Vex's hospitality, the young noble put his hands on his hips. \"Yes, well, I suppose that shouldn't be a problem. Even so, I won't have my employees being paid in-\" at that moment a battering ram must have hit the door, a thin layer of dust descending down off of the ceiling and room's other adornments from the sheer impact. For a moment the the two men looked at each other and then to the girl before them, as if she could offer an explanation, but when no explanation came forth Lord Baxter fixed Vex with an expectant stare. With a nod, Vex headed once more out the door and down the staircase. \"Perhaps we should wait and continue this once we see what this disturbance has been about.\" the Lord suggested. Downstairs, the ranger made his way to the door, yanking it open with a groan of hinges to reveal an almost entirely darkened exterior. Fortunately, the Ranger held up a candle, casting light over his features, and those of his visitor. Another woman? This one, however, seemed different. Certainly less friendly. With his dark, glittering eyes glancing past her as if looking for the ogre that had knocked on his door he motioned for her to come in. \"You must be here for the job?\" he said, though after his last burn he seemed less certain of his own question. \"I am Vex, Ranger of Lord Baxter. I'll get you a towel and a change of clothes.\" he offered, setting the candle down on the table beside them. \"Please try not to nick anything while I'm gone.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Tsali offered to take the quest, even going so far as to compliment Vex's hospitality, the young noble put his hands on his hips. \"Yes, well, I suppose that shouldn't be a problem. Even so, I won't have my employees being paid in-\" at that moment a battering ram must have hit the door, a thin layer of dust descending down off of the ceiling and room's other adornments from the sheer impact. For a moment the the two men looked at each other and then to the girl before them, as if she could offer an explanation, but when no explanation came forth Lord Baxter fixed Vex with an expectant stare. With a nod, Vex headed once more out the door and down the staircase. \"Perhaps we should wait and continue this once we see what this disturbance has been about.\" the Lord suggested. "}, "post-76353": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1512834724000", "message": "I looked as confused as the two men after the small shake up, You'd think there'd be none on the road at this hour, Especially not with this weather, We looked at each other in silence until the ranger moved downstairs with nothing more than a small nod. i turned back at Lord Francoeur,\"I agree\" i said as he offered to wait yet i was Hoping i could use this moment to ask some questions or just explain to him what he needed. \"May i ask you about this quest? What exactly it is\" I asked curiously. as i held my hands on my back. \"As i don't know much about it yet it might be useful to fill me in for now\".  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "I looked as confused as the two men after the small shake up, You'd think there'd be none on the road at this hour, Especially not with this weather, We looked at each other in silence until the ranger moved downstairs with nothing more than a small nod. i turned back at Lord Francoeur,\"I agree\" i said as he offered to wait yet i was Hoping i could use this moment to ask some questions or just explain to him what he needed. \"May i ask you about this quest? What exactly it is\" I asked curiously. as i held my hands on my back. \"As i don't know much about it yet it might be useful to fill me in for now\".  "}, "post-76358": {"user": "Hilde", "user_num": 2697, "timestamp": "1512847048000", "message": "When the door was opened, Hilde was certainly relieved, though her expression remained one of vague annoyance. As the... servant, she supposed, evaluated her, she observed his candle-lit visage, looking him up and down, sizing him up. He seemed alright, at least in her books. When, at long last, she was invited inside, she quickly accepted, half-muttering and half-grunting in assent.  She simply nodded, when he asked about her purpose there. It was, after all, the truth. She just wished she didn't have to wade through a storm to get there. His following statement identified him as a ranger in service of the lord of this house, which made an awful lot of sense, as he didn't have the air of a... what was the word? A butler. Hilde really didn't need a change of clothes, but she supposed letting what she had dry wasn't a bad idea. If the ranger was willing to offer, who was she to refuse? Nevertheless, the tall woman bristled at the implication that she might steal something. \"I ain't no thief,\" she muttered, gritting her teeth. \"I'm a legitim- legitime- I'm a pro, dammit!\" Of course, by now the ranger had already left, so she was unsure whether he'd heard her. Hopefully, it was so. She didn't want any misunderstandings. She was legit! She was! She didn't cut a classy figure, but she was no two-timing thief. It was no use. Sighing, the archer looked about the entrance of the manor. She flicked a statuette with her left, making it quiver and shake. As it was about to fall, she steadied it, grasping it with her hand before it could topple over. Crisis averted. Hilde then stood back, and awaited patiently Vex's return. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When the door was opened, Hilde was certainly relieved, though her expression remained one of vague annoyance. As the... servant, she supposed, evaluated her, she observed "}, "post-76373": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1512870173000", "message": "Hilde wouldn't be alone for long before the ranger, lost somewhere in the darkness appeared without warning. Clutching a bundle of a towel and a fresh set of clothes, he proffered it to her. As what Tsali wore these clothes were clearly cut to fit a man, though it likely wouldn't have trouble fitting Hilde's frame. \"Legitimate. Right.\" Vex replied dryly as he picked up the candle once more. Ushering her up the steps, towards the now-ajar door, the Ranger stopped in the doorway. \"We have another visitor.\" he informed the Lord. \"This one is even here for the quest.\" he added, though he didn't leave the dripping Hilde for long. Returning to her side he stopped at an adjacent room, opening the door. This was likely once the quarters of a servant, the thin mattress sagging on the bed as if left unattended to for decades. The smell of must was overpowering, and dust caked any surface it had access to. Shying away from light a small mouse darted beneath the bed in terror of the giants that had so suddenly decided to invade its territory. \"The maids haven't been in for awhile.\" Vex stated, though whether or not it was a joke was difficult to tell from his lack of enthusiasm, reaching up to scratch at his beard. \"We have someone else meeting Lord Baxter, currently. You will receive your briefing then.\" he told her, turning away from the door. \"Leave your items in the room and I will see too it they get dried before dawn.\"Waiting patiently, Lord Baxter began examining his books on the shelves that lined his walls, the dim light from the candle hardly giving enough to see them all. When Tsali asked her question, however, he looked more directly at her. \"Well, I suppose if our mercenary friend who arrived read my posting, he must already be aware of the situation. I'm sure he won't mind if I recap it for you. Fort Lortham, long since lost to time, has been rediscovered! Vex managed to find it during his travels, something I had been searching for for years! While I wanted it to be investigated immediately, there were apparently some disturbing \"noises\" and \"Movement\" coming from within and apparently Vex thought it best to return here and hire some adventurers to help clear it out. That is where you and our new mercenary come in! You two will go with Vex back to Fort Lortham, and clear it from whatever manner of beast calls it its home. Once it is finished, you will get your first term of payment and you can choose to release yourself from my services.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Hilde wouldn't be alone for long before the ranger, lost somewhere in the darkness appeared without warning. Clutching a bundle of a towel and a fresh set of clothes, he proffered it to her. As what Tsali wore these clothes were clearly cut to fit a man, though it likely wouldn't have trouble fitting Hilde's frame. \"Legitimate. Right.\" Vex replied dryly as he picked up the candle once more. Ushering her up the steps, towards the now-ajar door, the Ranger stopped in the doorway. \"We have another visitor.\" he informed the Lord. \"This one is even here for the quest.\" he added, though he didn't leave the dripping Hilde for long. Returning to her side he stopped at an adjacent room, opening the door. This was likely once the quarters of a servant, the thin mattress sagging on the bed as if left unattended to for decades. The smell of must was overpowering, and dust caked any surface it had access to. Shying away from light a small mouse darted beneath the bed in terror of the giants that had so suddenly decided to invade its territory. "}, "post-76377": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1512875254000", "message": "\"Lortham\" She whispered as she looked pensively back at the man, swearing she had heard it before yet it escaped her mind, Possibly she was thinking of another place entirely or maybe she has heard it as a passive comment from someone she met on her travels. She dismissed it quickly as it didn't seem like the best time to engage in deep thoughts. \"That seems fair enough\" she continued \"Is there any information on this beast?\" it seemed like a simple quest especially for a party of 3 people. And the ranger's physique seemed well enough to handle small or even medium sized beasts so i wondered what kind of beast this could be, not only that but a new visitor was intriguing for sure. One thing was certain however, I finally knew the rangers name, Vex.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Lortham\" She whispered as she looked pensively back at the man, swearing she had heard it before yet it escaped her mind, Possibly she was thinking of another place entirely or maybe she has heard it as a passive comment from someone she met on her travels. She dismissed it quickly as it didn't seem like the best time to engage in deep thoughts. \"That seems fair enough\" she continued \"Is there any information on this beast?\" it seemed like a simple quest especially for a party of 3 people. And the ranger's physique seemed well enough to handle small or even medium sized beasts so i wondered what kind of beast this could be, not only that but a new visitor was intriguing for sure. One thing was certain however, I finally knew the rangers name, Vex."}, "post-76396": {"user": "Hilde", "user_num": 2697, "timestamp": "1512943186000", "message": "Hilde was just about to start tearing into the ranger, as she felt she was being insulted, when he handed her the clothes. She paused to look them over -men's clothing, but they'd fit her fine, she supposed. Besides, she was used to wearing street clothing, fit for long journeys on dusty roads. Never once in her life had the archer worn a skirt. Well, not since she got the tattoos, at any rate. Absentmindedly, almost by reflex, she rubbed her right arm, suppressing a shudder and a grimace. Nothing beyond simple awkwardness surfaced on her body language, as she fidgeted in the entrance. When Vex returned, Hilde allowed herself to be led away, to a nearby room that had probably known better days. \"I can see that,\" she said, chuckling, echoing his quip. \"I don't mind.\"She didn't. She'd slept in much, much worse conditions, more times than she could count. Like on the bloodstained cot a man had just died in, and in a moldy, abandoned barn. At least this place had a roof and a bed. She hadn't come to be comfortable, she'd come here to kill things and people for coin. \"Tha's okay.\" someone else? Must've been some 'toff. \"So long as I get ta meet th' lord, I can wait.\"His final address was met with a muttered \"Yeah, yeah...\", as the archer started undressing, unfastening the cuirass and removing her soaked boots. She rapidly wore her borrowed clothing, only adding her own belt, with attached dagger. The great bow was left leaning against the wall, next to its titanic bolts. Hilde waited. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Hilde was just about to start tearing into the ranger, as she felt she was being insulted, when he handed her the clothes. She paused to look them over -men's clothing, but they'd fit her fine, she supposed. Besides, she was used to wearing street clothing, fit for long journeys on dusty roads. Never once in her life had the archer worn a skirt. Well, not since she got the tattoos, at any rate. Absentmindedly, almost by reflex, she rubbed her right arm, suppressing a shudder and a grimace. Nothing beyond simple awkwardness surfaced on her body language, as she fidgeted in the entrance. "}, "post-76399": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1512948668000", "message": "Outside the storm seemed to worsen, even audible deeper in the bowels of the estate. With them, however,joined a knock on Hilde's door. When there was no protest, Vex opened the door with a creak, leaning inside. \"Come with me. The Lord will want both of you to hear this.\" he explained. Letting the woman walk out, he glanced at the massive bow, arching a brow before overtaking her so he could show her the way. Such a thing was hardly necessary however, as he merely led her to an adjacent room, stopping her before entering. \"Lord Baxter will see you now. Make sure you refer to him as \"Lord Francoeur\" or \"milord\". Stand straight, and try not to waste his time.\" he told her, as if reading from a script. \"If nothing else, I'm sure he will at least provide you with shelter until the storm clears.\" With that, he swung open the door, stepping inside. \"Lord Baxter, your second mercenary has arrived.\" announced. Within, the young Lord beamed, stepping past Tsali for a moment. \"Excellent!\" he declared cheerfully. \"Bring him in, Vex, anyone who knocks as hard as he did surely can handle a few monsters!\" The Ranger inclined his head slightly, not correcting the Lord's assumption as he motioned for Hilde to enter. In an instant, the Lord Francoeur's face fell at the sight of her. He had expected a giant of a man, not a scrawny woman! Even so, he managed to reapply his smile, though it was considerably less sincere. \"I didn't realize there were so many woman adventurers! How...quaint. Come in, please. Now is time for proper introductions. I am Lord Baxter H. Francoeur, as I'm sure you're both well aware of. I study ancient magics and how it effects the development of what others might call, \"Magical beasts.\" Now, for the quest. As you both likely know by now, Vex has rediscovered Fort Lortham, a lost symbol of our history. Now, what is important about Fort Lortham, one might ask? About forty years ago, this fort served faithfully until one fateful day: Overnight this fort simply...disappeared-\" the Lord raised his arms slightly, wiggling his fingers as if to accent the spookiness of the entire situation. After a moment he cleared his throat, continuing- \"Anyways, this phenomenon seemed to steal the entire fort and the grounds beneath it in the night, leaving nothing but a crater where it once remained. No one who was in the fort was ever recovered, nor heard from again. For forty years this has been nothing more than an unsolved mystery. Until now.\" motioned towards Vex he gave a proud grin. \"My ranger has rediscovered the fort in my name! It still stands and seems to have been teleported to a different location, a week's travel by horseback from here. Imagine, it was so close! Practically right under our noses, and still not discovered. I intend to study it fully but Vex believes it to be inhabited by something. As such he refused to go in alone, but with the three of you working together, you should very well be able to clear this Fort at and set up my own teleportation circle, allowing me to join you when safe!\" he paused them, holding out his arms slightly as if waiting to hear their undoubtedly ecstatic reactions. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Outside the storm seemed to worsen, even audible deeper in the bowels of the estate. With them, however,joined a knock on Hilde's door. When there was no protest, Vex opened the door with a creak, leaning inside. \"Come with me. The Lord will want both of you to hear this.\" he explained. Letting the woman walk out, he glanced at the massive bow, arching a brow before overtaking her so he could show her the way. Such a thing was hardly necessary however, as he merely led her to an adjacent room, stopping her before entering. \"Lord Baxter will see you now. Make sure you refer to him as \"Lord Francoeur\" or \"milord\". Stand straight, and try not to waste his time.\" he told her, as if reading from a script. \"If nothing else, I'm sure he will at least provide you with shelter until the storm clears.\" "}, "post-76427": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1513008188000", "message": "Before the lord could answer my question vex had already returned with the new guest, his voice announcing a mercenary as he swung open the door.\u00a0 I\u00a0 stepped aside as baxter excitedly greeted the new person, a clear tone of glee. His tone however noticeably dimmed down when she walked in. My gaze turning to him with a quick frown as i could have guessed the reasoning for his sudden drop of enthusiasm before turning to the new guest. A towering woman that looked liked this wasn't her first quest by long shot.it seemed like she was hit pretty hard too by the pouring rain fall as she was wearing the same attire i was wearing with the only notable difference being that she took her blade with her, I simply greeted her with a short welcome and a bow before the lord quickly started to talk again.His next comment also did not seem very promising on his expectations yet i let it slide. Ancient magics however, that seemed more like it, maybe i had finally found someone that could help me understand my connection to the wind. It was a different field of magic study yet it couldn't hurt to ask him later i thought. A soft smile appeared on my lips as this info sinked in. The explanation followed with his exciting tone, Lortham still sounding vaguely familiar but its legend was new to me, Something powerful must have done it be it human or not teleporting an entire fort was no easy task. His pride for his ranger also not going amiss. I however was looking forward to this journey, Hoping i could get more out of this than just a place to rest and maybe some coin.\u00a0 i raised my arm after he was done talking \"Are you a magic user yourself\" i asked without permission before it dawned on me that he maybe was expecting a more energy filled response than this.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Before the lord could answer my question vex had already returned with the new guest, his voice announcing a mercenary as he swung open the door.\u00a0 I\u00a0 stepped aside as baxter excitedly greeted the new person, a clear tone of glee. His tone however noticeably dimmed down when she walked in. My gaze turning to him with a quick frown as i could have guessed the reasoning for his sudden drop of enthusiasm before turning to the new guest. A towering woman that looked liked this wasn't her first quest by long shot.it seemed like she was hit pretty hard too by the pouring rain fall as she was wearing the same attire i was wearing with the only notable difference being that she took her blade with her, I simply greeted her with a short welcome and a bow before the lord quickly started to talk again."}, "post-76428": {"user": "Hilde", "user_num": 2697, "timestamp": "1513011009000", "message": "Hilde followed in stride -it was why she was here, after all. The 'Lord Francoeur' did not seem like much, but she could see now that he probably actually had access to coin deserving of such a mission. The longer he spoke of it, however, the more she grew annoyed. Not that she let it show, remaining impassible through the briefing. She didn't actually care about the specifics, considering it was clear that nothing of actual import had been discovered. She couldn't care less about any magic fort, and since Vex hadn't mentioned what lurked within, she had no use for this explanation. She wasn't a scholar, not by a long shot. She was there to scour the place of anything living -and possibly dead, though she hoped that wasn't the case. She might prepare some specialty arrows on the way, just in case.\u00a0Then, the discussion turned to magic, teleportation and all that fucking witchery. And Hilde's expression turned sour. She was about to voice her complaints, when the little girl -well, short, at any rate- interrupted her, and asked the very same question she was about to. Though, perhaps, her wording would have been less polite.\u00a0\"Good question. Are ya?\" growled the archer, almost confrontational, and clearly ready to leave at a moment's notice. \"I don't do jobs for wizards, ya hear?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Hilde followed in stride -it was why she was here, after all. The 'Lord Francoeur' did not seem like much, but she could see now that he probably actually had access to coin deserving of such a mission. The longer he spoke of it, however, the more she grew annoyed. Not that she let it show, remaining impassible through the briefing. She didn't actually care about the specifics, considering it was clear that nothing of actual import had been discovered. She couldn't care less about any magic fort, and since Vex hadn't mentioned "}, "post-76441": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1513020432000", "message": "When Tsali spoke up, the young Lord gave her a smile, about to answer before Hilde interrupted harshly. His smile faded, and he put his hands on his hips. \"I am not. I have no magical affinity myself, nor have I tried to acquire any. No, my interests are purely academic. Wizards tend to bum about, casting spells and altering the fabric of reality without a thought to the consequences. What I'm doing, is discovering how that magic is affecting the world around us. However, I'm not so foolish as to dismiss the use of magical items as they make things quite convenient.\"Glancing between them, his enthusiasm seemed to have dimmed somewhat between their lack of excitement at his announcement and Hilde's rather aggressive nature. Glancing past them for a moment he caught sight of his ranger, shaking his head almost imperceptibly . Nodding just as slightly, the ranger tucked his dagger quietly back into his belt listening attentively as if nothing had happened. \"Now, perhaps I should discuss your rewards? You will, of course, receive a choice.\" heading around his desk he pulled the drawers open, pulling out two wrapped bundles. Picking one up he unwrapped it, and as the cloth fell away the room was filled with a strange, dappled blue glow. What he held was a curious, glistening blade, seemingly made from crystal. \"This blade is made from Kordanite. Sharper than steel and supposedly indestructible, not to mention resistant to magic.\" he explained, holding it by the tip and handle gently so they could see the crystalline blade in its full glory. \"If you had the skill to use it, it would prove a useful tool for any daring adventurer.\" Sheathing it in a surprisingly unadorned scabbard clearly made for it. \"Frankly I've no more use for it, and Vex prefers different weapons. It isn't exactly ornamented since I only required it for my studies, but it's still a valuable weapon.\" setting it aside he picked up the second wrapped item, unwrapping it and setting it on the table between them. Within was a strange, interlocked length of silver plates that ended at a point. \"This, is a particularly potent item.\" he informed them. Picking it up, he pressed the flat base at the nape of his neck and, unexpectedly, the other plate snapped forward like a serpent, hugging the curve of the back of his head and eventually the pointed end rest gently against his forehead. It was certainly a bizarre looking device, but he seemed unharmed. \"The power of this little trinket is twofold: It allows you to see in the dark, and-\" he motioned to Vex to approached, and the ranger, still as unimpressed with the whole situation as ever, wheeled a cart set with a glass tank of water past the two women. When he'd gone and gotten it was impossible to say, but when he had it pulled up next to the young lord Baxter, with a flourish of his hands, dunked his head straight into the water. Then, turning to look at the girls even from his awkward, position, grinned. \"And this is my second reward. You can see in the darkest night and breath beneath the water!\" he told them. Straightening up, his head came above water, providing another unusual attribute: He was completely dry! \"At the very least you can use it to avoid the ill effects of rain!\" Placing a finger to the base of his skull where the item was latched onto it fell limp, allowing him to strip it off and set it on the desk once more. \"Now, if nothing else, you could always sell these items. I'm sure the amount you could net for either would be plenty for the quest.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Tsali spoke up, the young Lord gave her a smile, about to answer before Hilde interrupted harshly. His smile faded, and he put his hands on his hips. \"I am not. I have no magical affinity myself, nor have I tried to acquire any. No, my interests are purely academic. Wizards tend to bum about, casting spells and altering the fabric of reality without a thought to the consequences. What I'm doing, is discovering how that magic is affecting the world around us. However, I'm not so foolish as to dismiss the use of magical items as they make things quite convenient.\""}, "post-76443": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1513022990000", "message": "Tsali seemed disappointed after the reply of baxter, Yet she noticed the tension in the winds caused by the outburst of the woman next to me, With her tone and stance however i started hoping the lord had simply denied these claims because of the new guest that seemed to have strong opinions of magic to say the least.\u00a0I simply followed the lord to the desk placed at the far side of the room. Leaving a good step between the woman and me. Without the need to i'd prefer not to stay to close to her, I might not be a mage, Far from in fact. the only thing Magical about me was that i could jump quite high and run a bit faster but that's hardly a ability to write home about is it.\u00a0After baxter finished his story I inspected both items deeply, The crystal blade sparkling off of what little candle light there was. They seemed valuable but not to me however, I didn't need them nor did i feel for them.\u00a0\"I'm sorry\" i said as i looked down at the items. \"But a bed and a few small coins shall be enough for me\" i said, Turning my eye to some of the books on the wall, Thinking to myself for a moment before talking again \"Could i talk to you later in private\" I asked the lord, My gaze however still looking at the books placed carefully in rows to the wall.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Tsali seemed disappointed after the reply of baxter, Yet she noticed the tension in the winds caused by the outburst of the woman next to me, With her tone and stance however i started hoping the lord had simply denied these claims because of the new guest that seemed to have strong opinions of magic to say the least.\u00a0"}, "post-76444": {"user": "Hilde", "user_num": 2697, "timestamp": "1513023855000", "message": "Hilde's stance relaxed itself considerably as the 'toff explained himself. A scholar, not a mage. That made all the difference in the world. She still found magic distasteful, but she could certainly tolerate someone who merely studied it, but could not harness it. How much harm could a simple scholar do? Not much, she reckoned. She could work for him, yes. The archer had been acutely aware of the ranger and his readied strike. Well, she did not know precisely what he would do, but she was threatening his lord. It only made sense that a bodyguard might wish to protect his charge. As soon as the explanation was delivered, Hilde bowed her head and brought her right fist up to her chest. \"Apologies, m'lord. I don't approve much of witchery,\" she explained. She didn't seem terribly sorry, but it was a matter of form, of deference. An employer had to trust an employee for a business relation to work. Apology delivered, now remained the issue of payment, of course, which the nobleman was addressing. The sword was stunningly beautiful, and, if he was to be believed, had magic-denying properties. That was a tool she might have a use for. Of course, it was a weapon she had no experience with. She could learn, of course. The second tool was far more useful, and caused her far more conflict. On the one hand, it was a bewitched artifact. On the other, it would allow her to breathe underwater, be always dry, and see in the dark. An invaluable tool for an archer such as her. She watched as the shorter girl declined either prize, and requested simple coin and bedding. Hilde was tempted to do the same.She supposed the night-sight trinket was more than useful, to her. Perhaps she could use it to kill a few mages, down the line, to make herself feel better about picking it. Or, as he'd said, she could sell it. \"I'll take the trinket. Mighty useful, I reckon.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Hilde's stance relaxed itself considerably as the 'toff explained himself. A scholar, not a mage. That made all the difference in the world. She still found magic distasteful, but she could certainly tolerate someone who merely studied it, but could not harness it. How much harm could a simple scholar do? Not much, she reckoned. She could work for him, yes. The archer had been acutely aware of the ranger and his readied strike. Well, she did not know precisely what he would do, but she "}, "post-76445": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1513026859000", "message": "When Tsali refused both of his gifts, Baxter couldn't hide his disappointment. Something lost when she asked if she could speak to him privately later. He smiled his best charming smile at her. \"Of course, I'd be glad to speak to you later.\" he assured her. When Hilde spoke up for one of the artifacts, however, he nodded. \"Yes, I can see how that would benefit any adventurer. You will receive the artifact upon completing your mission. Once I have teleported over, I will be happy to give it to you. As for you, however.\" he added, looking at Tsali once more. \"I have a reputation to uphold, and I'll not lose any future help because I gave someone who worked for me a pittance such as you're asking. I insist you take some coin at the very least.\" he told her firmly, not leaving room for debate. \"Even if you decide to drop it in a ditch at once, it would do you a disservice not to pay you.\" Looking past them at Vex, he clapped twice. \"Surely the guest quarters will be suitable? A bit dusty, perhaps, but usable.\" Circling back around his desk he picked up both items, pulling open the drawer and placing them within. \"Vex should be able to answer any further questions you have. If you'll excuse me.\" The ranger, nodding, opened the door,  motioning for them to follow him. \"I'll show you to your rooms.\" he offered. Heading down the hallways on the assumption they would follow him. Around them the heads of several creatures, magical and otherwise adorned the walls. Ancient weapons and gaudy decorations, caked with dust and negligence, barely visible on the dim light of the candle. \"These will be your rooms.\" Vex informed them, stopping at two nearby doors. Opening them each revealed them to be nearly identical in decor, minus one having a griffin head mounted on the wall and the other, some sort of disturbing, deep sea fish. The guest rooms were no exception to the dust, and both rooms smelled strongly of must that hung in the stale air. \"Make yourself at home. Lord Baxter does not use the dining hall, so I will be bringing food to each of your rooms if you want anything.\" he explained. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Tsali refused both of his gifts, Baxter couldn't hide his disappointment. Something lost when she asked if she could speak to him privately later. He smiled his best charming smile at her. \"Of course, I'd be glad to speak to you later.\" he assured her. When Hilde spoke up for one of the artifacts, however, he nodded. \"Yes, I can see how that would benefit any adventurer. You will receive the artifact upon completing your mission. Once I have teleported over, I will be happy to give it to you. As for you, however.\" he added, looking at Tsali once more. "}, "post-76447": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1513030525000", "message": "I didn't\u00a0mean to disappoint\u00a0bexter by refusing his gifts, I simply didn't need them. His smile however seemed reassuring, I was wrong however. Never have i seen anyone take his reputation so seriously, It was quite nice in theory yet i couldn't help but shuffle backwards from his reaction. \"Do not worry\" I replied with a smile, Hoping it would calm his nerves. \"I have something far more valuable in mind\" I said alluring to my request for a private conversation. \"Knowledge\" I smiled.\"Thats would be great\" I replied to his offer of a sleeping quarter, Thinking that i should watch my tongue around her however. As we passed the creatures again in the dusty almost dilapidated corridors of the mansion i started to speak as i directed my gaze from the walls to the ranger \"Vex was it not?\" I asked on our journey to the dorms, \"Would you mind if i got my stuff into my room?\" I asked, wondering if he would do it for me or if i had to bring them back myself.\u00a0When we got to in the room however i thanked vex, Lightly but politely. The dust however was quite severe and i wondered if i could blow the dust away, My ability was weak if you were being generous but i suppose it couldn't hurt to try. I locked the door and placed myself i a meditation position on the bed, Dust falling from the mattress and squeaking bed frame as i did and started to meditate. A slow passive wind started to swirl around the room, Barely enough to blow a leaf away. Comfortable in the fact that she had some privacy she started to concentrate on her surroundings, The flow around her and creating a small tame gust wind that started to blow this dust away.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "I didn't\u00a0mean to disappoint\u00a0bexter by refusing his gifts, I simply didn't need them. His smile however seemed reassuring, I was wrong however. Never have i seen anyone take his reputation so seriously, It was quite nice in theory yet i couldn't help but shuffle backwards from his reaction. \"Do not worry\" I replied with a smile, Hoping it would calm his nerves. \"I have something far more valuable in mind\" I said alluring to my request for a private conversation. \"Knowledge\" I smiled."}, "post-76619": {"user": "Hilde", "user_num": 2697, "timestamp": "1513434054000", "message": "The bandaged woman simply nodded at the Lord's words -she only expected advance payment from people she feared could not pay. There would be no issues with a 'toff, of course, so she did not bother. Ah, sleeping arrangements were being made? Then there was another room, was there? Good. Hopefully it would be at least a little better -not that it mattered, but she'd take what comfort she could find, of course. The ranger led them a ways away, and to the guest rooms. Along the way, Hilde considered her would-be companion. A slip of a girl who certainly didn't look like mercenary material. Who was she? A sneaky sort, perhaps? Trap-finder, lock-breaker? That could be, but somehow that didn't quite fit, either. She'd find out, probably. The rooms were dusty from years of disuse, but very similar, except for the decor. They weren't as bad as the first room she'd been led to, but they were still rather... well, stale. She'd make her peace, of course. She always did. Vex explained the food situation -not that Hilde cared, she had her own rations- and seemed about to otherwise leave. \" 'scuse me, ranger. There's the matter of my possessions. Ye can dry the clothes, but I'll handle the bow an' bolts, if ye don't mind carrying them over.\" Her bow was her livelihood. Perhaps more importantly, it was the only part of her possessions that she actually cared about. Everything else could be replaced, easily, but the bow was special, one of a kind. Even if it were rebuilt, it would never be quite the same. What was it, now? Nine years? Yes, nine years she'd had the thing. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The bandaged woman simply nodded at the Lord's words -she only expected advance payment from people she feared could not pay. There would be no issues with a 'toff, of course, so she did not bother. "}, "post-76623": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1513451042000", "message": "As the two women filed into their room, each with their own request, Vex bobbed his head in conformation, not bothering with bowing to their new guests. Scratching at his scraggly beard he turned, \"I'll get both of your things.\" he assured them as he handed the candle he had been carrying to Hilde and lighting another disused candlestick in the hallway before giving it to Tsali so she, too, would have light. Leaving the two women to their devices he turned, walking away into the darkness of the manor. The downtime provided to both of them was surely welcome, as the hail came down outside and despite the shabby appearance of the manor there were no leaks or drafts. It might have been concerning as the alien fish rattled somewhat in Tsali's room, almost seeming to be ready to leap from the wall, but in the end it was only the breeze she had created. Standing in the guest room, Vex had a hand on his chin, staring at the massive bow propped against the wall. Maybe if he...no, he couldn't carry it like that. Perhaps they had a cart...? It was about an hour before Hilde got a knock on her door. Or, more accurately, a struggling clatter and something heavy was roughly placed against the door frame. Then, a knock came on Tsali's door. \"It's Vex.\" the man said through the door, although sounding strangely out-of-breath.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As the two women filed into their room, each with their own request, Vex bobbed his head in conformation, not bothering with bowing to their new guests. Scratching at his scraggly beard he turned, \"I'll get both of your things.\" he assured them as he handed the candle he had been carrying to Hilde and lighting another disused candlestick in the hallway before giving it to Tsali so she, too, would have light. Leaving the two women to their devices he turned, walking away into the darkness of the manor. The downtime provided to both of them was surely welcome, as the hail came down outside and despite the shabby appearance of the manor there were no leaks or drafts. It might have been concerning as the alien fish rattled somewhat in Tsali's room, almost seeming to be ready to leap from the wall, but in the end it was only the breeze she had created. "}, "post-76633": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1513462971000", "message": "The gust was starting to pick up pace as i sat still in my meditating position, A sweat droplet falling from my forehead as the dust particles begun to fuse themselves with the wind. a smoggy air now filled the room as i tried to sense for any cracks where i could send dust filled air. As i was unable to find an opening, likely because my ability to just wasn't there yet. I decided to send the wind to the back of the closet, Piling the layers of dust behind it as i begun to rest again, Letting myself backwards on the bed as my breath increased. i noticed how the sweat drops where falling from my face as i looked around the room. The room was much tidier now yet there was still a small presence of filth and dust that presumably fell out of my wind spiral or was never caught at all. I kept laying there to regain my strength from the strain it left on my energy. THe was a bigger strain than usual however. Probably because of the long day I thought to myself.Time flew by as i noticed the knock on my door. It took me a second to carry myself off the bed again yet i made my way to the door. unlocking it and opening it for vex to enter. \"Welcome, Enter as you'd like\" I said to him before i quickly noticed his odd irregular breathing \"Need a hand\" i asked as i looked to him.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The gust was starting to pick up pace as i sat still in my meditating position, A sweat droplet falling from my forehead as the dust particles begun to fuse themselves with the wind. a smoggy air now filled the room as i tried to sense for any cracks where i could send dust filled air. As i was unable to find an opening, likely because my ability to just wasn't there yet. I decided to send the wind to the back of the closet, Piling the layers of dust behind it as i begun to rest again, Letting myself backwards on the bed as my breath increased. i noticed how the sweat drops where falling from my face as i looked around the room. The room was much tidier now yet there was still a small presence of filth and dust that presumably fell out of my wind spiral or was never caught at all. "}, "post-76634": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1513464451000", "message": "Opening the door, Vex waved off her offer to help. \"Not at all, I finished what I was doing otherwise.\" he told her, casting a momentary glare at the oversized bow. \"Lord Baxter will see you now for your personal request.\" he informed her, motioning for her to follow him. Once she had left the room he glanced around it momentarily, taking note of its unusual cleanliness. Maybe they should have hired her as a maid rather than a mercenary... Taking her down the hallway, heled the way with his candles, glancing out the window as the storm began to at last let up though the rain still pattered at the windows. Wordlessly he stopped in front of Lord Baxter's door, rapping it with his knuckles three times. Then, despite no answer, he pushed it open, letting her head inside. Within a few more candles were lit, providing much better illumination than their chat earlier. Strangely that wasn't the only thing different about the room. The floor, all the way to the desk was covered in rose petals, accompanied by a light dusting of them on the desks surface which the Lord Baxter currently sat. In either hand he held crystal glasses of wine. \"You wanted to...talk?\" he asked suggestively, clearly misinterpreting her intentions as he proffered one of the glasses. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Opening the door, Vex waved off her offer to help. \"Not at all, I finished what I was doing otherwise.\" he told her, casting a momentary glare at the oversized bow. \"Lord Baxter will see you now for your personal request.\" he informed her, motioning for her to follow him. Once she had left the room he glanced around it momentarily, taking note of its unusual cleanliness. Maybe they should have hired her as a maid rather than a mercenary... Taking her down the hallway, heled the way with his candles, glancing out the window as the storm began to at last let up though the rain still pattered at the windows. Wordlessly he stopped in front of Lord Baxter's door, rapping it with his knuckles three times. Then, despite no answer, he pushed it open, letting her head inside. "}, "post-76635": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1513466468000", "message": "I stretched my head out the door to get a clearer view of what vex was glaring to, Seeing the humongous bow leaning against the door. \"Is that.. The other woman's bow?\" I questioned as i pointed towards it, Stepping out in the grand halls to get a better view of it. I pulled myself away from thought and wonder again as i heard vex approaching again, Following his back again to baxter's office. Yet i was beginning to think he didn't quite understand what i was talking about when i entered. i didn't move further than a step or two from the door as i saw the lord laying on his desk. \"Ehh..\" She sounded baffled, \"I wanted to talk about my reward\" I said hastily while taking a more alert stance, before turning to vex behind me who didn't seem to have a much better reaction. Wondering to myself if this was such a good idea after all. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "I stretched my head out the door to get a clearer view of what vex was glaring to, Seeing the humongous bow leaning against the door. \"Is that.. The other woman's bow?\" I questioned as i pointed towards it, Stepping out in the grand halls to get a better view of it. I pulled myself away from thought and wonder again as i heard vex approaching again, Following his back again to baxter's office. Yet i was beginning to think he didn't quite understand what i was talking about when i entered. i didn't move further than a step or two from the door as i saw the lord laying on his desk. \"Ehh..\" She sounded baffled, \"I wanted to talk about my reward\" I said hastily while taking a more alert stance, before turning to vex behind me who didn't seem to have a much better reaction. Wondering to myself if this was such a good idea after all. "}, "post-76636": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1513467006000", "message": "\"Your- o-oh yes of course! Yes, your reward!\" realizing her awkwardness and the slightly questioning tone of her voice, Lord Baxter hopped to his feet, stretching. \"Y-yes, of course you- Oh this?\" he asked without her prompting, motioning towards the rose pedals. \"Ah, well, it was getting a bit musty in here, I thought I might, ah, freshen up the room a bit! Yes, it smells quite nice!\" With a sweep of his arm he brushed the pedals away, making certain he got every one of them. Then, picking up the glasses he took a sip from each. \"Oh, and I do love to...to enjoy both, uh, two glasses of wine while thinking. It really, ah, takes the edge off a hard day's work!\" Clearing his throat he took a seat behind his desk, cursing softly as he stood back up and removed a rose from his chair, thorns and all before casting it aside before taking a seat, cleaning his throat and clearly trying to regain control of the situation. \"So, you came to discuss your reward?\" he asked, seeming at least somewhat stable now as Vex shook his head in exasperation.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Your- o-oh yes of course! Yes, your reward!\" realizing her awkwardness and the slightly questioning tone of her voice, Lord Baxter hopped to his feet, stretching. \"Y-yes, of course you- Oh this?\" he asked without her prompting, motioning towards the rose pedals. \"Ah, well, it was getting a bit musty in here, I thought I might, ah, freshen up the room a bit! Yes, it smells quite nice!\" With a sweep of his arm he brushed the pedals away, making certain he got every one of them. Then, picking up the glasses he took a sip from each. \"Oh, and I do love to...to enjoy both, uh, two glasses of wine while thinking. It really, ah, takes the edge off a hard day's work!\" "}, "post-76637": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1513467955000", "message": "\"Yes, For my reward\" She said cautiously as she did her best to ignore all that just happened. She moved a few steps closer to the desk. \"And before i start can i assume that this will stay between us?\" She said, The fact that the lord was most probably expecting more than a talk escaping her mind for a second. \"No\" She quickly added as she regretted her previous comment \"I meant like, conversation\" Hoping that that would clear the record again for a normal conversation. Turning to vex again hoping for some support of any kind as he seemed like the least insane human in this mansion at the moment.i took a big breath before turning to the lord again and walking towards the desk \"I'm looking for some books\"\u00a0 she started, \"Books about wind magic specifically\" i said, Now leaning on the chair at my side of the desk. \"Anything at all\" Her expression had clearly changed in her last sentences, she was now far more serious in tone and posture.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Yes, For my reward\" She said cautiously as she did her best to ignore all that just happened. She moved a few steps closer to the desk. \"And before i start can i assume that this will stay between us?\" She said, The fact that the lord was most probably expecting more than a talk escaping her mind for a second. \"No\" She quickly added as she regretted her previous comment \"I meant like, conversation\" Hoping that that would clear the record again for a normal conversation. Turning to vex again hoping for some support of any kind as he seemed like the least insane human in this mansion at the moment."}, "post-76640": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1513472350000", "message": "When Tsali turned to Vex he gave her a shrug. Apparently he hadn't been expecting this either, but thankfully he remained nearby. When Tsali began to speak of what she really was looking for though, Lord Baxter's smile faded, replaced with a business-like demeanor. She was speaking about magic? \"So, you're a sorcerer then.\" he prompted, seeming somewhat displeased at the prospect. Glancing back at Vex the ranger did not give any clue as to having known himself. Even so, Baxter turned his attention back to Tsali. \"I do actually have a few things akin to what you're looking for. I tend to keep them in my private collections and...out of circulation. You are, however, doing me a service and that service should be rewarded. Let us make a deal: These books were difficult to obtain, but I shall let you have them to study. Only, however, within the estate. You stay or visit, and learn what you need and I will keep you on. Vex has a hard time tracking down these tomes, after all, and I cannot allow them to fall into the hands of mages again.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Tsali turned to Vex he gave her a shrug. Apparently he hadn't been expecting this either, but thankfully he remained nearby. When Tsali began to speak of what she really was looking for though, Lord Baxter's smile faded, replaced with a business-like demeanor. She was speaking about magic? \"So, you're a sorcerer then.\" he prompted, seeming somewhat displeased at the prospect. Glancing back at Vex the ranger did not give any clue as to having known himself. Even so, Baxter turned his attention back to Tsali. "}, "post-76641": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1513474298000", "message": "\"I wouldn't call me a sorcerer quite yet, My powers are weak at most but i do want to learn more\" she said with a clear passion in her voice, Anyone could tell you that this meant a lot for her after that. \"I'll go accord with those terms\" She said quickly after baxter finished his words. Wondering only afterwards what he meant with his last few words, It seemed mages weren't as appreciated in these parts of the world. Understandable in ways, magic was the most devastating power known to man after all. She paused, in battle with herself if she should ask further questions. She had her deal now, What more do you want. \"What if i want to become a mage?\" She asked, Her hands grasping the chair a bit tighter as she did so, A worrisome yet passionate face now staring at lord baxter. Anxiously waiting for a response. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I wouldn't call me a sorcerer quite yet, My powers are weak at most but i do want to learn more\" she said with a clear passion in her voice, Anyone could tell you that this meant a lot for her after that. "}, "post-76642": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1513474808000", "message": "When Tsali asked about becoming a mage truly, Baxter sat back in his chair, taking a sip from one of the two glasses he had filled earlier. \"I suggest you not travel too far down that road.\" he informed her. \"Mages are all-too-keen on...disturbing the natural order of things. The more there are, the worse things will, inevitably become. Even now throughout my rooms you can see the products of their...tampering. Elemental magics may be all well and good if used wisely but to become a true mage? I wouldn't delve too deeply down that hole. Do you understand my point, darling?\" he asked. While the conversation had started between them lighthearted and awkward, it had taken on more menacing connotations. \"I'm sure you must be tired, Vex will be sure to show you back to your room.\" he finished, waving her away. \"I'm afraid I have much to prepare for when I arrive at Fort Lortham, and Vex has things he needs to finish tonight as well. You'll be off first thing in the morning after all.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Tsali asked about becoming a mage truly, Baxter sat back in his chair, taking a sip from one of the two glasses he had filled earlier. \"I suggest you not travel too far down that road.\" he informed her. \"Mages are all-too-keen on...disturbing the natural order of things. The more there are, the worse things will, inevitably become. Even now throughout my rooms you can see the products of their...tampering. Elemental magics may be all well and good if used wisely but to become a true mage? I wouldn't delve too deeply down that hole. Do you understand my point, darling?\" he asked. "}, "post-76643": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1513476466000", "message": "She didn't feel like making it a discussion, Although you could argue it already was. \"Very well\" She answered reluctantly. She didn't get it, the tribes of great plains flourished in their isolation because of its magical reliance, Water mages cleaning the rivers and watering the crops, Whole houses being build from rock and cobble in a matter of days, fire mages roasting the meat and ice mages building the dams. She understood the danger of course yet she was optimistic, Too optimistic you could say about people's ability to utilize magic for good. Her powers were rare, It is said that few have been gifted the powers of a wind spirit so she wasnt planning on wasting it. She headed out again, stopping at the door frame for one last glance back at lord baxter \"Thank you for your time\" She said before  heading towards her room again, laying her gear in the corner of the room and hanging her clothes to dry a little more. After all of this it was time to lay down and Ponder on everything that just happened as her flask started to glow a little. \"Tell me about it\" She said quietly.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She didn't feel like making it a discussion, Although you could argue it already was. \"Very well\" She answered reluctantly. She didn't get it, the tribes of great plains flourished in their isolation because of its magical reliance, Water mages cleaning the rivers and watering the crops, Whole houses being build from rock and cobble in a matter of days, fire mages roasting the meat and ice mages building the dams. She understood the danger of course yet she was optimistic, Too optimistic you could say about people's ability to utilize magic for good. Her powers were rare, It is said that few have been gifted the powers of a wind spirit so she wasnt planning on wasting it. "}, "post-77413": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1515192538000", "message": "The sun had yet to crest the horizon when a knocking came at Tsali Kaue's door. The room was still as dark as night, and without waiting too long, Vex cracked the door slightly, a sliver of candlelight the only thing to see by. \"Are you still here at least?\" the man asked dryly, poking his head in. Once satisfied that he wasn't talking to an empty bed, he placed the candle holder on the small table just inside the door. \"Get ready to set out. We need to begin travelling to Lortham as soon as possible.\" he told her.Closing the door the Ranger headed back downstairs, speaking to Lord Baxter in hushed tones. At least, what he had attempted to continue in hished tones. \"What do you mean she left?\" the Lord demanded, clearly frustrated. \"We have only one mercenary to handle the Fort? Damn it all.\" ", "link_list": ["/user/2670"], "image_list": [], "html": "The sun had yet to crest the horizon when a knocking came at "}, "post-77418": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1515197731000", "message": "\"Yha Yha\" She mumbled, Pulling the blankets over her head as the light of the candle illuminated the room. she sighed as she went to sit straight, moving her back to the head of the bed before she realised vex his words, \"Wait\" She said to no response. Looking up at the mounted animal opposed to her on the wall as she wondered what he meant with me still being here, rubbing it off quickly as nothing more than an oddly phrased sentence she jumped out of bed after a quick glance and opening the curtains and opening the window seals to let the room be filled with the early morning air. as she put on her clothes. It felt nice to finally wear her trusted attire again. She removed her improvised necklace and tied it to her pants again, Her bag was packed again she started to write a small note stating nothing more than the simple words of 'See you at the front porch' and stuck it to the outside of the door slightly behind a small splintered piece of the door. She picked up her dagger and bag and ran towards the window, Jumping out it with grace as she dropped down to the cold morning floor before being caught in a whirl of wind, her fall being halted to a crawl as she landed softly. Taking in the air she dropped her bag against the front porch, Taking her dagger and throwing  it to the air, Training her ability with it as she guided it gracefully in the air around her. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Yha Yha\" She mumbled, Pulling the blankets over her head as the light of the candle illuminated the room. she sighed as she went to sit straight, moving her back to the head of the bed before she realised vex his words, \"Wait\" She said to no response. Looking up at the mounted animal opposed to her on the wall as she wondered what he meant with me still being here, rubbing it off quickly as nothing more than an oddly phrased sentence she jumped out of bed after a quick glance and opening the curtains and opening the window seals to let the room be filled with the early morning air. as she put on her clothes. It felt nice to finally wear her trusted attire again. She removed her improvised necklace and tied it to her pants again, Her bag was packed again she started to write a small note stating nothing more than the simple words of 'See you at the front porch' and stuck it to the outside of the door slightly behind a small splintered piece of the door. She picked up her dagger and bag and ran towards the window, Jumping out it with grace as she dropped down to the cold morning floor before being caught in a whirl of wind, her fall being halted to a crawl as she landed softly. Taking in the air she dropped her bag against the front porch, Taking her dagger and throwing  it to the air, Training her ability with it as she guided it gracefully in the air around her. "}, "post-77494": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1515315081000", "message": "It didn't take long for Vex to find Tasli out front as he carried saddles out of the manor door, hefting each one out as he saddled two horses up. Although he glanced at her he didn't seem terribly interested in conversation. It seemed the animals had been brushed and cleaned earlier in the morning although even now the sun had yet to peek over the horizon. In the distance the sky looked as if paint had spilled upon it, creeping yellows and purples mingling with the distant rising sun. Packing a few last minute provisions into the saddlebags, the ranger at last glanced back at the girl. \"You had best be ready for a long ride,\" he told her, hardly more than his neutral voice, but seeming to carry perfectly well in the crisp morning air. \"and plenty of mud.\" he nodded to the ground which had, after last night's storm, become a deceptively solid mess of viscous goop. Setting his foot in the stirrup he swung his leg over the animal, guiding its feet as it shuffled eagerly. \"Are you ready?\" he asked, though light had yet to dawn. \"I want to be off the estate by sunrise.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It didn't take long for Vex to find Tasli out front as he carried saddles out of the manor door, hefting each one out as he saddled two horses up. Although he glanced at her he didn't seem terribly interested in conversation. It seemed the animals had been brushed and cleaned earlier in the morning although even now the sun had yet to peek over the horizon. In the distance the sky looked as if paint had spilled upon it, creeping yellows and purples mingling with the distant rising sun. Packing a few last minute provisions into the saddlebags, the ranger at last glanced back at the girl. "}, "post-77542": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1515359538000", "message": "As her blade flew around her, she herself busy with some kind of martial art presumably guiding it she noticed vex coming outside. \"good morning\" she said, Stopping her routine as she caught the blade in her hand as she turned her body towards him \"I'm ready if we have breakfast on the road\" She replied, Flicking the blade in its holster on her back. She picked up her bag and carried it on her back and walking towards the horses before noticing only two had been made ready \"Where's the third one\" asked tsali as she hopped over the puddles \"A horse for the other woman with the giant bow\" she said, Landing next to her horse on the other side of the puddle as she tied her bag to the back of the saddle.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As her blade flew around her, she herself busy with some kind of martial art presumably guiding it she noticed vex coming outside. \"good morning\" she said, Stopping her routine as she caught the blade in her hand as she turned her body towards him \"I'm ready if we have breakfast on the road\" She replied, Flicking the blade in its holster on her back. She picked up her bag and carried it on her back and walking towards the horses before noticing only two had been made ready \"Where's the third one\" asked tsali as she hopped over the puddles \"A horse for the other woman with the giant bow\" she said, Landing next to her horse on the other side of the puddle as she tied her bag to the back of the saddle."}, "post-78206": {"user": "Alliandre Saleia", "user_num": 1597, "timestamp": "1516229826000", "message": "Alli had seen the scroll, and immediately gone seeking a horse, purchasing one from a local stable and making her way to the Manor mentioned. The ride thus far had been relatively straightforward, and she had little difficulty in locating the manor, for the past few hours she had been able to head straight for it as she could see it from a distance. Her armored robes began to stream in the wind as the horse picked up his pace, carrying the rider to what she hoped would be a lucrative adventure, or at the very least a welcome change from the boredom at home.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Alli had seen the scroll, and immediately gone seeking a horse, purchasing one from a local stable and making her way to the Manor mentioned. The ride thus far had been relatively straightforward, and she had little difficulty in locating the manor, for the past few hours she had been able to head straight for it as she could see it from a distance. Her armored robes began to stream in the wind as the horse picked up his pace, carrying the rider to what she hoped would be a lucrative adventure, or at the very least a welcome change from the boredom at home."}, "post-78415": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1516390575000", "message": "Vex shook his head in dissatisfaction when Tsali brought up the woman with a bow. \"She ran off as soon as the storm stopped.\" he informed her. \"I would have put off the journey until we got someone to replace her, but Lord Baxter was so eager to see us on the road he demanded we still go. Now we're short one sword arm.\" the ranger was clearly annoyed, although his voice managed to remain free of contempt. After all, this was his job, and it seemed that it would be Tsali's as well. He glanced back as the manor doors opened and Lord Francoeur stepped out. He was dressed in finer clothes than he had been last night, although seemed somewhat weary. \"Vex, Ms. Kaue, I wish you a safe journey! Now, remember Vex, as soon as the place is clear set up that teleportation sigil! I won't be waiting here while the great Fort Lortham  sits empty!\" he prodded, to which is ranger nodded. \"Also, I-\" the noble began, though stopped when Vex held up a hand. Turning to the road he saw, heading towards them, another woman on a horse. Realizing what she must be here for, Lord Baxter Francoeur shimmied off the steps of his estate, approaching the woman with a raised hans, although Vex rode closely beside him, obviously wary of the newcomer.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vex shook his head in dissatisfaction when Tsali brought up the woman with a bow. "}, "post-78417": {"user": "Alliandre Saleia", "user_num": 1597, "timestamp": "1516392235000", "message": "The horse came to a slow trot and finally a stop as the tall woman riding it came to a halt in front of the people.\"Apologies for my delay, but I am here to answer your ad. You wanted adventurers I believe?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The horse came to a slow trot and finally a stop as the tall woman riding it came to a halt in front of the people."}, "post-78418": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1516392261000", "message": "\"Well that might be for the better then if she plays like that\" She answered to vex as he informed her about the situation, \"And i think its a bow short actually\" She smirked, A small comment to wash over the fact that it was going to be a two man mission from now on. She grabbed her bag and lunged it on the rear of the horse, using a few ropes from the saddle to secure it tightly on its rear end. and not soon after lord baxter came to greet us before the journey started, a speech more serious in tone than what i was used too sinds last night's miscommunication before remembering how that ended. As she patted her horse and was ready to climb up however the lord stopped as both he and vex noticed the woman heading towards us, I Get on my horse as a small burst of air outside of my control helped me up before guiding the horse back on itself to follow vex, Seeing the woman in spottles robes ride towards us i greeted her welcome with a wave. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Well that might be for the better then if she plays like that\" She answered to vex as he informed her about the situation, \"And i think its a bow short actually\" She smirked, A small comment to wash over the fact that it was going to be a two man mission from now on. She grabbed her bag and lunged it on the rear of the horse, using a few ropes from the saddle to secure it tightly on its rear end. and not soon after lord baxter came to greet us before the journey started, a speech more serious in tone than what i was used too sinds last night's miscommunication before remembering how that ended. As she patted her horse and was ready to climb up however the lord stopped as both he and vex noticed the woman heading towards us, I Get on my horse as a small burst of air outside of my control helped me up before guiding the horse back on itself to follow vex, Seeing the woman in spottles robes ride towards us i greeted her welcome with a wave. "}, "post-78421": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1516396296000", "message": "Looking up at Alliandre, Lord Baxter grinned triumphantly before turning to Vex. \"You see? You old worrywart, I told you things would work out! I am Lord Baxter Francoeur, welcome to Highwind. I'm afraid, though, if you're here for the job you won't be getting to see much of it until after your adventure!\" the Lord said cheerfully. He was young, in his mid-twenties and finely dressed. He frowned slightly in realization as he tapped his chin. \"Ah, I so wish you'd have seen the demonstrations last night, they were much more exciting. Let me show you what rewards I have to offer you!\" with a wave of his hands he began heading back to the building at a trot, not even staying to listen to the woman's reply if she had any. Vex, a shorter, middle aged man with a wiry build and a tangle of black hair that encompassed a thick, unkempt beard. He gave the woman a nod, seeming satisfied with their newest companion. \"I'm glad to have a third pair of hands.\" he admitted, although from the tone of his voice and generally unwelcoming expression, it hardly seemed like it. \"Our last pair turned out to me feet and ran out on us. The situation is this: Fort Fortham is some old fort that got magically teleported never to be seen again. I found it and Lord Baxter- That's Lord Francoeur to you -wants us to go clear it out. Once clear we set up a summoning sigil and Lord Baxter gets transported to the Fort so he can begin his...\"Cursory investigation\" in safety. From there you can grab your reward and head out, or stay with Tsali and I and see through whatever other plans he has for the place. Any questions?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Looking up at Alliandre, Lord Baxter grinned triumphantly before turning to Vex. "}, "post-78492": {"user": "Alliandre Saleia", "user_num": 1597, "timestamp": "1516474188000", "message": "\"No questions at all. Not so much in it for the rewards as I am the adventure, but I certainly won't turn them down.\" She said cheerfully. \"I suppose I should follow him in?\" Alli asked rhetorically.With a sigh she urged her horse to start moving with a quiet command, the beast walking up until she caught up to the Lord.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"No questions at all. Not so much in it for the rewards as I am the adventure, but I certainly won't turn them down.\" She said cheerfully. "}, "post-78524": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1516491357000", "message": "As soon as vex started talking tsali pulled up next to him, a short young tinted woman with rugged clothes that looked like they had seen meany miles, the murky colours making her blend well into the nature around us, Everything except her bright blue necklace witch formed a strong contrast to the rest of her clothing. \"Yha, welcome.\" i replied to her before she road off and i directed my gaze towards vex \"If you don't mind i think i'll wait here, Can't take that long right?\" i said before asking some quick directions to the stables so i could get some more supplies in the meantime.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As soon as vex started talking tsali pulled up next to him, a short young tinted woman with rugged clothes that looked like they had seen meany miles, the murky colours making her blend well into the nature around us, Everything except her bright blue necklace witch formed a strong contrast to the rest of her clothing. \"Yha, welcome.\" i replied to her before she road off and i directed my gaze towards vex \"If you don't mind i think i'll wait here, Can't take that long right?\" i said before asking some quick directions to the stables so i could get some more supplies in the meantime."}, "post-78556": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1516560901000", "message": "Giving Tsali the appropriate instructions, the ranger led his horse after Alliandre and Lord Baxter. The woman seemed pleasant enough, but he wasn't going to leave the lord along with her as long as he could help it. As they passed through the mansion's entryway and up the steps, the young Lord would step into a door at the top. By the time anyone had followed him through they would find him fussing with a lock on a desk drawer before pulling it open. \"I'll confess\" he told Alliandre. \"I had a more elaborate presentation last night, so this will be a little less...thrilling. We even threw out the tank of water.\" Without clarifying he removed two wrapped bundles, setting them both atop his desk. Unwrapping the first, dapples of blue light joined the sunlight pouring through a nearby window. Halfway sheathed appeared to be a blade of indigo crystal. Slightly warped in appearance it clearly wasn't too finely crafted, nevertheless it was strong, and as Lord Baxter unsheathed it, placing it atop his finger sideways he showed its perfect balance. \"This is a blade of Kordanite, known for its antimagic properties. Sharp as steel, and beautiful to boot. Unfortunately I didn't get it decorated as I merely needed it for research, but I'm sure it would aid any adventurer such as yourself.\" Sheathing it back into its unadorned scabbard, he picked up the next bundle, unwrapping it. This one was different, a series of interlocking silver panels than ended it a point like an arrow. Pressing the rear tail to the base of his skull it, similarly to last night, snapped forward, hugging the curve of his skull and the tip pressed directly into his forehead. \"This little trinket has powers that are threefold: One: It lets you breath underwater! Second: It allows you to see in darkness! and finally, water slides right off of you, preventing you from getting wet!\" he reached up, pressing the base of his skull and letting it fall away before placing it on the table. \"Now, our friend Tsali graciously refused these more conventional awards, so either of them are yours once I step through that teleporter. And that one would beee...?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Giving Tsali the appropriate instructions, the ranger led his horse after Alliandre and Lord Baxter. The woman seemed pleasant enough, but he wasn't going to leave the lord along with her as long as he could help it. As they passed through the mansion's entryway and up the steps, the young Lord would step into a door at the top. By the time anyone had followed him through they would find him fussing with a lock on a desk drawer before pulling it open. "}, "post-78637": {"user": "Alliandre Saleia", "user_num": 1597, "timestamp": "1516628371000", "message": "\"Having fought in both the destruction of Aeadan and the Isran war against Goraia, I have seen enough 'elaborate presentations' for one lifetime.\" She said wryly.Alli watched as the various items were showcased, listening to their descriptions keenly.\"I shall take the blade if that's alright, I have no problems getting wet.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Having fought in both the destruction of Aeadan and the Isran war against Goraia, I have seen enough 'elaborate presentations' for one lifetime.\" She said wryly."}, "post-79010": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1517250433000", "message": "Smiling appreciatively at Alliandre that she chose one of his baubles, he gave a nod of agreement. \"Excellent, the blade will prove to be quite useful to you, I'm sure!\" He assured her, before giving a nod to Vex behind her. Now satisfied with the woman's answers he was eager for them to be heading off in the direction of Fort Lortham. After all, the sooner he had it back under his control, the sooner he would be able to give them their rewards and see it for himself! \"I hope you're not too tired of riding.\" Vex spoke up, gesturing past him at the door for her to go first, less out of politeness and more out of duty to keep her from trying to slip something into her pockets. (Not that she had any he could see.), Even so, the way she spoke and presented herself, as well as her supposed triumphs in battle gave him some relief from that concern. As well as to the concern of having only one inexperienced ally at his side. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Smiling appreciatively at Alliandre that she chose one of his baubles, he gave a nod of agreement. "}, "post-79516": {"user": "Alliandre Saleia", "user_num": 1597, "timestamp": "1518186311000", "message": "\"Not at all.\" She replied, smiling. It felt good to be back at it, and she mounted her horse with grace. \"Lead the way!\" The woman said cheerfully, her horse eager to get started as well.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Not at all.\" She replied, smiling. It felt good to be back at it, and she mounted her horse with grace. "}, "post-79517": {"user": "Tsali Kaue", "user_num": 2670, "timestamp": "1518192964000", "message": "As the new companion left the house again tsali was still packing the last few things for this journey,the light slowly starting to creep above the treetops around them. \"Hey, welcome to the group\" she said as she looked over to our new companion whilst knotting a bag of supplies to their horses, walking towards the new traveler shortly after with a quick glance at vex behind her before turning back again \"I suppose you've got a proper briefing about what we're supposed to do\" She stopped only a step away from her steed as she reached out her hand for a handshake \"I'm tsali, Nice to meet ya\". After this she gave a nod in approval and returned to her horse, Climbing on top it with a quick burst of wind upwards at her feet \"We should make pace quickly if you want to keep your schedule\" She announced with a louder voice that stood in firm contrast to her usually quieter and smoother voice. \"Sunset is approaching quickly\" She paused to look around at the forest around her \"Let's take an example from it\" she said whilst directing her gaze back at the group, Waiting for vex to give the word go.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As the new companion left the house again tsali was still packing the last few things for this journey,the light slowly starting to creep above the treetops around them. \"Hey, welcome to the group\" she said as she looked over to our new companion whilst knotting a bag of supplies to their horses, walking towards the new traveler shortly after with a quick glance at vex behind her before turning back again \"I suppose you've got a proper briefing about what we're supposed to do\" She stopped only a step away from her steed as she reached out her hand for a handshake \"I'm tsali, Nice to meet ya\". After this she gave a nod in approval and returned to her horse, Climbing on top it with a quick burst of wind upwards at her feet \"We should make pace quickly if you want to keep your schedule\" She announced with a louder voice that stood in firm contrast to her usually quieter and smoother voice. \"Sunset is approaching quickly\" She paused to look around at the forest around her \"Let's take an example from it\" she said whilst directing her gaze back at the group, Waiting for vex to give the word go."}, "post-79691": {"user": "City of Whispers", "user_num": 2660, "timestamp": "1518476363000", "message": "Vex nodded as the two women seemed prepared for the trek. Things go much smoother when everyone is on the same page, after all. The arrival of their newest companion had set his timetable back a fraction, but not overmuch so as they left the Manor Highwind the sun was beginning to peek over the horizon. \"Make certain you're both prepared. We won't be coming back here anytime soon.\" he warned, although once it seemed as if everything was fine he began to lead the way. Off the estate, through the gates which he stopped at, dismounting and locking them behind him and they were off once more. [Exit]", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vex nodded as the two women seemed prepared for the trek. Things go much smoother when everyone is on the same page, after all. The arrival of their newest companion had set his timetable back a fraction, but not overmuch so as they left the Manor Highwind the sun was beginning to peek over the horizon. "}}